dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX B Y 882
PFX B 0 0/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 0/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 0 [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 0/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 a/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 a/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 a [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 a/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 ab/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 ab/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ab [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ab/efYX o
PFX B 0 aba/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 aba/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 aba [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abak/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 abaka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 abang/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abanga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abangayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abangayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abangayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abangazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abangazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abangazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abayo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abazo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 abeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 abenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 abengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 abeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 abezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 abu/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 abuk/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 abuka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 abw/efYX [ae]
PFX B 0 ak/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 ak/efYX o
PFX B 0 aka/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 akak/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG_class1+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 akaka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG_class1+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 aku/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 akuk/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 akuka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 akw/efYX [ae]
PFX B 0 al/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 al/efYX o
PFX B 0 ali/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 alik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 alika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 alu/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 aluk/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 aluka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 alw/efYX [ae]
PFX B 0 an/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 ang/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 ang/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 anga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angi/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 angik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 angika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 ani/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 anik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 anika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 as/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 asi/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 asik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 asika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 aw/efYX [ae]
PFX B 0 aw/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 aw/efYX o
PFX B 0 awa/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 awak/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 awaka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 awu/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 awuk/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 awuka/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 ay/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 aye/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 aye/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 ayeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ayenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ayeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ayeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ayezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ayezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ayi/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 ayik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 ayika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 ayo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 az/efYX [aeiou]
PFX B 0 azi/efYX [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 azik/eYX [aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 azika/eYX [^aeiou] PRESENT_IND_NEG+EXCLUSIVE
PFX B 0 azo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 b/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 b/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 b/di o
PFX B 0 b/d o SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ba/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 ba/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 bab/id o RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 babe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 babeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 babenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 babengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 babezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 babu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 babung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 babunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 babungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 babuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 babuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 babw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 be/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 beb/id o RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bebe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bebeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bebenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bebengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bebezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bebu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bebung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bebunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bebuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bebuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bebw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bek/id o RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beku/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bekung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bekunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bekungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
