dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
abuza/BC
acula/BC
ahlukanisela/BC
akha/BC
akhisa/BC
alana/BCY
alisa/BC
amba/BC
ambulela/BC
amula/BC
anda/BCY
andulela/BC
anga/BC
anya/BC
aphuca/BC
atha/BC
azela/BC
aziwa/BC
babazana/BC
babelela/BC
bakuza/BC
balela/BC
bamba/BC
bambelela/BC
banda/BC
bandlula/BC
bangela/BC
banjwa/BCY
bawela/BC
beba/BC
bekisa/BC
betha/BC
bhacaza/BC
bhaka/BC
bhambabula/BC
bhaqa/BC
bheda/BC
bhekeka/BC
bhibhidla/BC
bhinqa/BC
bhodloza/BC
bhongoza/BC
bhucunga/BC
bhulela/BC
bhuquza/BC
bilisa/BC
biyela/BC
bona/BC
bonga/BC
bophezela/BC
bukana/BC
bumbana/BC
busisa/BC
buyelana/BC
buzwa/BCY
cana/BC
cashela/BC
catshangwa/BC
celwa/BCY
chaphaza/BC
chela/BC
chiphiza/BC
chofoza/BC
chwaza/BC
cikoza/BC
cindezeleka/BC
cobosha/BC
cothoza/BC
culwa/BCY
cwasa/BC
cwilisa/BC
dakwa/BC
dansa/BC
deka/BC
dida/BC
dilika/BC
dingida/BC
dlalisa/BC
dleka/BC
dloba/BC
dlulela/BC
donda/BC
dubulwa/BCY
dukuza/BC
dunga/BC
dwanguza/BC
eboleka/BCY
edlulela/BC
ehla/BC
ehlukana/BC
ekhamisa/BC
eluka/BC
embula/BC
enaba/BC
enda/BC
eneza/BC
enqaba/BC
enyuka/BC
enzelela/BC
ephuza/BC
esabisa/BC
esulela/BC
ethembisa/BC
etshisa/BC
eya/BC
fadalala/BC
fanela/BC
felwa/BC
fihla/BC
fingqa/BC
fohla/BC
fudumeza/BC
fula/BC
fumbeka/BC
funisa/BC
fuza/BC
gadla/BC
gamanxa/BC
ganisela/BC
gaxa/BC
gcinana/BC
gculisa/BC
gedla/BC
genqeza/BC
gijima/BC
gingqika/BC
godola/BC
goloza/BC
gotsha/BC
gqama/BC
gqilaza/BC
gquba/BC
gubhuzela/BC
gudlula/BC
gunda/BC
guqukezela/BC
gwaqaza/BC
gweva/BC
gxeka/BC
gxumela/BC
hambela/BC
hayiza/BC
hhuma/BC
hlabelela/BC
hlakazeka/BC
hlambalaza/BC
hlanganisa/BC
hlasela/BC
hlehla/BC
hlephula/BC
hloba/BC
hlolela/BC
hlonipha/BC
hlula/BC
hlupha/BC
hluza/BC
hogela/BC
hubha/BC
huqa/BC
jala/BC
jijimeza/BC
joba/BC
juba/BC
kaka/BC
kepezela/BC
khahlela/BC
khalela/BC
khandumba/BC
khanya/BC
khathala/BC
khehla/BC
khesa/BC
khipha/BC
khohlakala/BC
kholwa/BC
khononda/BC
khova/BC
khukhula/BC
khulisa/BC
khulwa/BCY
khungatha/BC
khuthaza/BC
khweleza/BC
kishwa/BCY
klewula/BC
klunyuka/BC
kweqisa/BC
lalaza/BC
landela/BC
lawula/BC
lendla/BC
libala/BC
linda/BC
liwa/BC
lolonga/BC
luba/BC
lumba/BC
lunywa/BCY
manda/BC
matanisa/BC
mbibiza/BC
melelana/BC
mfoma/BC
misela/BC
mpaza/BC
mukeleka/BC
naya/BC
ncika/BC
ncokola/BC
ndlala/BC
nengeka/BC
nethezeka/BC
ngcofa/BC
ngenela/BC
ngqofa/BC
ngunga/BC
nikwa/BCY
nkenteza/BC
nonga/BC
nqamula/BC
nqina/BC
nqwabela/BC
ntaza/BC
ntwela/BC
nweba/BC
nxephezela/BC
nyakazisa/BC
nyanya/BC
nyemfuza/BC
nyonya/BC
nyundela/BC
okha/BC
ona/BCY
ongama/BC
osa/BC
otha/BC
pasa/BC
phaka/BC
phambana/BC
phangalala/BC
phaphazela/BC
phathelana/BC
phefumula/BC
phelezela/BC
phendulwa/BCY
phephula/BC
phihlika/BC
philwa/BCY
phipha/BC
phohloza/BC
phosa/BC
phucuka/BC
phulula/BC
phundla/BC
phunza/BC
phuthuma/BC
popola/BC
qabula/BC
qaleka/BC
qansa/BC
qashwa/BCY
qeketha/BC
qhamuka/BC
qhayisa/BC
qhibuka/BC
qhosha/BC
qhugela/BC
qhutha/BC
qhweba/BC
qoba/BC
qondila/BC
qoqa/BC
qubula/BC
qunga/BC
saba/BC
sakaza/BC
sasaza/BC
sebenzana/BC
selwa/BC
sezela/BC
shadwa/BCY
shaqeka/BC
shaywa/BCY
shendeza/BC
shibilika/BC
shikiza/BC
shiseka/BC
shiyela/BC
shoshela/BC
shumayela/BC
shushumba/BC
shwela/BC
sikwa/BCY
sinaba/BC
sinisa/BC
sisela/BC
sizila/BC
sombulula/BC
suba/BC
sula/BC
swabuluka/BC
taka/BC
tatazela/BC
tha/BC
thamunda/BC
thandazela/BC
thatha/BC
thefula/BC
theleza/BC
thenda/BC
thethelela/BC
thintitha/BC
thokomala/BC
tholisa/BC
thotha/BC
thulula/BC
thungela/BC
thushuka/BC
thwasa/BC
totoba/BC
tshela/BC
tshuza/BC
valela/BC
veva/BC
vimbana/BC
vova/BC
vuleleka/BC
vundla/BC
vuselela/BC
vuza/BC
wawaza/BC
wolela/BC
wuza/BC
xazula/BC
xephula/BC
xhaphazela/BC
xhuma/BC
xola/BC
xoxwa/BCY
yabaza/BC
yaleza/BC
yekela/BC
yephuzela/BC
yingiliza/BC
yola/BC
zabalaza/BC
zalwa/BCY
zeca/BC
zimaza/BC
zingela/BC
zomba/BC
zula/BC
PFX C 0 b/BY o OBJ
PFX C 0 l/BY o OBJ
PFX C 0 nga/BY [^aeiou] POTEN
PFX C 0 ngakw/BY [ae] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngang/BY [aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngawa/BY [^aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 s/BY [aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 sak/BY o PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sam/BY . PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 saw/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 si/BY [^aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 z/BY [aeiou] OBJ
